West Virginia, session 2025, HB2444.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 22B. Limited Video Lottery. Part XIV. Net Terminal Income and Distribution of Revenues. §29-22B-1406. Examination of permittee books and records. The commission has the right to examine all accounts, bank accounts, financial statements, and records in a permittee's possession for only the limited video lottery business that is under the permittee's control or in which the permittee has an interest and the licensed permittee shall authorize all third parties in possession or in control of the accounts or records to allow examination of any of those accounts or records by the commission. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home